Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.090

Procedure at hearing.

At the hearing, an administrative law judge appointed under chapter 34.12 RCW shall be the presiding officer, and shall make all necessary rulings in the course of the hearing, but shall not be entitled to vote.

The complainant and the officer complained of may submit evidence, and be represented by counsel, and a full and complete record of the proceedings, and all testimony, shall be taken down by a stenographer.

After hearing, the findings of the trial board shall be submitted to the chief. Such findings shall be final if the charges are not sustained. In the event the charges are sustained the chief may determine the proper disciplinary action and declare it by written order served upon the officer complained of.

[ 1989 c 28 s 2; 1984 c 141 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.090. Prior: 1943 c 205 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6362-70.]